Louisiana, session 2026, HB1130.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:263 and 3996(B)(24) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§263. Hunting course
A. Each public school governing authority with jurisdiction over schools
with grades five through twelve shall offer age- and grade-appropriate hunting
courses for the students in such grades. Such courses shall include but need not be
limited to firearms training, hunter education, and conservation education.
B. The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education, in consultation
with the Louisiana Department of Wildlife and Fisheries, shall adopt rules in
accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act for the implementation of this
Section.
* * *
§3996. Charter schools; exemptions; requirements
* * *
B. Notwithstanding any state law, rule, or regulation to the contrary and
except as may be otherwise specifically provided for in an approved charter, a
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1836 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1130
charter school established and operated in accordance with the provisions of this
Chapter and its approved charter and the school's officers and employees shall be
exempt from all statutory mandates or other statutory requirements that are
applicable to public schools and to public school officers and employees except for
the following laws otherwise applicable to public schools with the same grades:
* * *
(24) Hunting course, R.S. 17:263.
* * *
Section 2. The provisions of Section 1 of this Act shall be initially implemented in
the 2027-2028 school year.